src/fst/morphology/phonology.twolc
!! # Livonian morphophonology

!! This file documents the [phonology.twolc file](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-liv/blob/main/src/fst/phonology.twolc) 

!! We first show alphabet and sets, thereafter rules.


!! ## Alphabet

Alphabet
a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z  !!= * @CODE@ 
A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z  !!= * @CODE@ 
ḑ ļ ņ ŗ š ț ž									     !!= * @CODE@ 
Ḑ Ļ Ņ Ŗ Š Ț Ž									     !!= * @CODE@ 
õ ä ö ȯ											     !!= * @CODE@ 
Õ Ä Ö Ȯ											     !!= * @CODE@ 
ā ē ī ō ū ǟ ǭ ȭ ȱ								     !!= * @CODE@ 
Ā Ē Ī Ō Ū Ǟ Ǭ Ȭ Ȱ								     !!= * @CODE@ 
ʼ !! * ʼ Stød

! loosening the rule to allow ǭ:ō 2013-06-26
!ǭ:ō
!Ǭ:Ō These are dealt with in filters 2020-10-22

!! ### Literal quotes and angles
!! They must be escaped (cf morpheme boundaries further down):

 »7     !! »7
 «7     !! «7
 %[%>%] !!= @CODE@ - Literal >
 %[%<%] !!= @CODE@ - Literal <

!! ### Archiphonemes for consonant lengthening

%{XC%}:p %{XC%}:t %{XC%}:k		      !!= * @CODE@
%{XC%}:b %{XC%}:d %{XC%}:g		      !!= * @CODE@
%{XC%}:l %{XC%}:ļ %{XC%}:j				      !!= * @CODE@
%{XC%}:m %{XC%}:n %{XC%}:ņ		      !!= * @CODE@
%{XC%}:r %{XC%}:ŗ				      !!= * @CODE@
%{XC%}:š %{XC%}:v %{XC%}:z %{XC%}:ž   !!= * @CODE@
%{õØ%}:õ !!= * @CODE@ in umblõ:umb%{õØ%}lõ

!! ###  Triggers

 %^PenVV2V:0 !!= * @CODE@ penultimate vowel shortening
 %^Tense:0 !!= * @CODE@ = Tense stem will have stød if proper stem type
 %^D2T:0   !!= * @CODE@ d:t veʼž:veʼd:vietā
 %^PreI:0  !!= * @CODE@ i:0 veʼž:veʼd:vietā
 %^ĪE2Ē:0  !!= * @CODE@ kēļ kīel
K1:k       !!= * @CODE@ this k is not effected by gradation
%^NoGrad:0 !!= * @CODE@  This will be placed after a stem to break Gradation
%^CC2C:0 !!= * @CODE@ this weakens the stem ompel to ommel
%^TS:0     !!= * @CODE@ The ti => si
%^D2Ž:0    !!= * @CODE@ The *ti => *si
%^D2ZERO:0 !!= * @CODE@ The d => 0

%^Pen:0	   !!= * @CODE@ penultimate syllable
%^U2ZERO:0 !!= * @CODE@ The u => 0
%^VV2V:0	 !!= * @CODE@ shorten vowel

!! ###  Vowel raising
%^VOWLower:0 !!= * @CODE@ lower vowel
%^VOWRaise:0     !!= * @CODE@ raise vowel
%^VowsSh1:0   !!= * @CODE@ vowel shortening in first syllable
%^VowsShU1:0  !!= * @CODE@ 
%^VowsShI1:0  !!= * @CODE@
%^VowsShIn1:0 !!= * @CODE@
%^DiphthSh1:0 !!= * @CODE@ 
%^VowsLI1:0   !!= * @CODE@ vowel lengthening that is followed by "i" when short
%^VowsLU1:0   !!= * @CODE@ vowel lengthening that is followed by "u" when short
%^VowsL1:0    !!= * @CODE@ vowel lengthening 
%^DiphthL1:0  !!= * @CODE@ 
%^LongV2Õin2:0   !!= * @CODE@ long vowel to õ in second syllable
%^Vow2Iin2:0   !!= * @CODE@ vowel to i or ī in second syllable

!! ### Vowel metathesis
%^VowsMetath:0   !!= * @CODE@

!! ### VOWEL SHORTENING
 %^VowShIn1:0	!!= * @CODE@ This causes vowel shortening in 1. syll
                !!= * @CODE@ accompanied by coda consonant lengthening
 %^A2ÕIn2:0       !!= * @CODE@ This causes 2. syll a => õ
%^StodRM:0  !!= * @CODE@ 
%^ConsSh:0  !!= * @CODE@ 
%^ConsL:0 !!  * @CODE@ lengthen consonant
%^1Sh2L:0  !!= * @CODE@ 
%^Stress1to2:0  !!= * @CODE@ 
%^Stress2to1:0  !!= * @CODE@ 
%^UltRmVow:0 !!≈ * __@CODE@__ - for removing ultimate vowels i, ? after final consonant in stem
%^VowsMRM:0 !!≈ * @CODE@ Vow in middle ētam:eitmõd
%^VowsRM:0  !!= * @CODE@ 
%^ConsRM:0  !!= * @CODE@ 
%^PalatalizeLeft:0 !!  * @CODE@ laps:läpš
%^DePal:0 	   !! * @CODE@ 
%^VowsL1aToǭ:0  !!= * @CODE@ 
%^Õ2I:0 !! * @CODE@ kīndõr:kīndiriž
%- !!  * @CODE@ Hyphen in  constructions 
%> !!  * @CODE@ morpheme boundary
#   !!  * @CODE@ Word boundary for both lexicalised and dynamic compounds

;


!! ## Sets

Sets

VowBack = a o u A O U ;											   !!≈ * @CODE@ 
VowFront = ä ö y ü Ä Ö Y Ü ;									   !!≈ * @CODE@ 
VowNeutral = e i E I ; 											   !!≈ * @CODE@ 
VowNonHigh = a o ä ö e A O Ä Ö E ;								   !!≈ * @CODE@ 
VowLong  = ā ō ū ǟ ǭ ȭ ȱ ȫ ȳ ǖ ē ī Ā Ō Ū Ǟ Ǭ Ȭ Ȱ Ȫ Ȳ Ǖ Ē Ī ;	   !!≈ * @CODE@ 
VowShort = a o u ä ǫ õ ȯ ö y ü e i A O U Ä Ǫ Õ Ȯ Ö Y Ü E I ;	   !!≈ * @CODE@ 
Vow = VowLong VowShort ;										   !!≈ * @CODE@ 
CnsWithStod = b d g j l ļ m n ņ r ŗ v z ž ;						   !!≈ * @CODE@ 
Cns = b c č d ḑ f g ģ h j k ķ l ļ m n ņ p q r ŗ s š t ț v z ž 	   !!≈ * @CODE@ 
      B C Č D Ḑ F G Ģ H J K Ķ L Ļ M N Ņ P Q R Ŗ S Š T Ț V Z Ž ;	   !!≈   @CODE@ 
Letters = Vow Cns ;												   !!≈ * @CODE@ 
Dummy = %^DePal %^CC2C %^ConsSh %^ConsL %^VOWLower %^PalatalizeLeft %^PenVV2V %^Pen %^VV2V %^U2ZERO   !!≈ * @CODE@ 
  %^VOWRaise %^ConsRM %^StodRM %^Stress1to2 %^VowsLI1 %^VowsSh1 %^VV2V %^VowsRM ;  !!≈   @CODE@ 

DummyNoPen = %^DePal %^CC2C %^ConsSh %^ConsL %^VOWLower  %^PalatalizeLeft %^VV2V %^U2ZERO   !!≈ * @CODE@ 
  %^VOWRaise %^ConsRM %^StodRM %^Stress1to2 %^VowsLI1 %^VowsSh1 %^VV2V %^VowsRM ;  !!≈   @CODE@ 

!Definitions
!
!CnsStrengthening = [ b: 0:b | d: 0:d | g: 0:g | j: 0:j | l: 0:l | ļ: 0:ļ | m: 0:m | ņ: 0:ņ | r: 0:r | ŗ: 0:ŗ | v: 0:v | z: 0:z | ž: 0:ž ];


!! # Rule section
Rules

!! ## Vowel rules

!! ### Shortening in first syllable


!! 
"ǟ:ä in first syllable"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
ǟ:ä <=>
# Cns* _ (u:) Cns Cns:* Vow: %^Pen: %^VV2V: \[ %^VOWRaise: ]* [ %> | # ] ;
# Cns* _ ( i ) Cns Cns:* (Vow:) [ %^VV2V:0 ] (%^A2ÕIn2:) [ %> | # ] ;
!!€ tǟutõ^PEN^VV2V
!!€ täutõ00
!!€# kǟnga%^VV2V%^A2ÕIn2
!!€0 kängõ00
        # Cns* _ ( u: ) Cns Cns:* (Vow:) %^VV2V: \[ %^VOWRaise: ]* [ %> | # ] ;

"ā:a in first syllable"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
ā:a <=>
# Cns* _  [( i ) (ʼ:)|ʼ:  i ] Cns:+ Vow: %^Pen: %^VV2V: ;
# Cns* _  ( i ) (ʼ:) Cns:+ (%{XC%}:) (Vow:) [ %^Stress1to2:0 | %^VowsSh1:0 | %^VV2V:0 ] ;
!!€# āļdža%^VV2V%^A2ÕIn2
!!€0 aļdžõ00
     # Cns* _ ( i ) (ʼ:) Cns:+ Vow: Cns: [%^PenVV2V:| %^Pen: %^VV2V:] ;
!!€# āita%^PenVV2V%^VowsRM%>õ
!!€0 ait000%>õ


"ȱ:ȯ"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
ȱ:ȯ <=> # Cns* _ Cns:+ (%{XC%}:|Vow:) %^VV2V: ;
!!€# vȱntsa%^VV2V%^VowsRM%>õ
!!€0 vȯnts0000õ

"ā:ī in second syllable plural"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
ā:ī <=>  _ [Dummy: - %^VowsRM:]* %^Vow2Iin2: ; 
!# Cns* Vow [ ʼ: | :ʼ ] [ :Cns | Cns: ] _ (%^ConsSh:) %^Vow2Iin2: ;
!!€# rikkā%^ConsSh%^Vow2Iin2>di
!!€# rik0ī000di

"ū:ī in second syllable plural"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
ū:ī <=>  _ ( %^ConsSh: ) %^Vow2Iin2: ;
!!€# ruzū%^Vow2Iin2>di
!!€# ruzī000di

!"a:i in second syllable plural"
!!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
!a:i <=>  _ ( %^ConsSh: |%^VowsSh1: %^PalatalizeLeft: ) %^Vow2Iin2: ; 
!!!€# āita%^Vow2Iin2>di
!!!€# āiti00di

"ǭ:a in first syllable"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
ǭ:a <=> # Cns* _  ( i: ) Cns:+ (%{XC%}:) Vow: [ %^Stress1to2:0 | %^VV2V:0 ]  ;
        # Cns* _  Cns (%{XC%}:) %^VV2V:0 \[ %^PalatalizeLeft: ] ;
        # Cns:* _ Cns:+ Vow: Cns: %^Pen: %^VV2V: ; 

"ē:e in first syllable"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
ē:e <=> # Cns* _  ( i: ) Cns:+ (:Cns) (Vow:) [ %^VowsShIn1:0 | %^Stress1to2:0 | %^VV2V:0 ] ;
!# Cns* _  ( :i ) :Cns+ Vow: %^Stress1to2:0  ;
 # Cns* _  ( i: ) Cns:+ (:Cns) Vow: Cns: [ %^VowsShIn1:0 | %^Stress1to2:0 | %^Pen: %^VV2V:0 ] ;
!! rēnaz+N+Sg+Gen:
!!€ rēinaz^Pen^VV2V^VowsRM^ConsRM>õ
!!€ rein000000>õ

"ū:u in first syllable"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
ū:u <=> # Cns* _  ( i  ) Cns:+ (:Cns) Vow: [ %^Stress1to2:0 | %^VV2V:0 ]  ;
    # Cns* _  (ʼ:) Cns:+ (%{XC%}:) %^VV2V:0 ;
    # Cns* _  Cns:+ Vow: Cns: %^Pen: %^VV2V:0 ;
         # [Cns - [p|m|b|v]] _ o Cns:+ (Vow:) %^VV2V:0 ;
         # [Cns - [p | m | b| v]]* _ o %^VV2V:0 ;
!!€ jūo^VV2V>i
!!€ juo0>i

"ū:ȯ in first syllable"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
ū:ȯ <=> # [p | m | v] _   o:  ( i ) Cns:+ (:Cns) (Vow:) [ %^Stress1to2:0 | %^VV2V:0 (%^PalatalizeLeft:)]  ;
 # [p | m | v] _   o:  ( i ) Cns:+  Vow: Cns: %^Pen:0 %^VV2V:0   ;
! # [p | b | m | v] _   o:  ( i ) Cns:+ (:Cns) (Vow:) [ %^Stress1to2:0 | %^VV2V:0 (%^PalatalizeLeft:)]  ;
!!€# pūol0a%^Stress1to2%^ConsL
!!€0 pȯ0llõ00
!!€# pūoga%^VV2V%^PalatalizeLeft%^VowsRM%>õ
!!€0 pȯig00000õ


"ī:i in first syllable"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
ī:i <=> # Cns* _  ( i | e ) (ʼ:) Cns:+ (Vow:) [ %^Stress1to2:0 | %^VV2V:0 ]  ;
      # Cns* _ Vow:* (ʼ:) Cns:+ (%{XC%}:) (Vow:) %^VV2V:0 (%^A2ÕIn2:0) ; 
!!€# tīer0a%^VV2V%^A2ÕIn2
!!€0 tierrõ00

"ȭ:õ in first syllable"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
ȭ:õ <=> # Cns* _  ( i | u: ) Cns:+ (Vow:) [ %^Stress1to2:0 | %^VV2V:0 ]  ;
!!€# mȭuka%^VV2V%^VowsRM%>õ
!!€0 mõuk0000õ

"ō:o in first syllable"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
ō:o <=> # Cns* _  ( i  | u ) Cns:+ (Vow:) [ %^Stress1to2:0 | %^VV2V:0 | %^VowsShU1: ]  ;
 # Cns* _  ( i  | u ) Cns:+ Vow: Cns: %^Pen:0 %^VV2V:0   ;
!! rōda+N+Pl+Par
!!€ rōuda^VV2V^PalatalizeLeft^VowsRM>i
!!€ rouḑ0000>i

!! lengthen vowels

"e:ē in first syllable"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
e:ē <=> # Cns* _  ( i: ) :Cns+ (Vow:) %^VowsLI1:0 ;
!!€# leiba%^VowsLI1%>st
!!€0 lē0ba00st
        # Cns* _   i: %^VowsLI1:0 ;
!!€# tei%^VowsLI1%>ḑi
!!€0 tē000ḑi

"u:ū in first syllable"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
u:ū <=> # Cns* _  ( i: | ʼ: | :ʼ ) :Cns+ (Vow:) %^VowsLI1:0 ;
!!€# ul%^VowsLI1>õd
!!€0 ūl00õd


!"õ:ȭ in first syllable"
!!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
!õ:ȭ <=> # Cns* _  ( u: ) :Cns+ (Vow:) %^VowsLI1:0 ;

"ȯ:ū in first syllable"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
ȯ:ū <=> # Cns* _  i:  Cns:+ (Vow:) %^VowsLI1:0  ;
! # Cns* _  0: i:  Cns:+ (Vow:) %^VowsLI1:0  ;

"ä:ǟ in first syllable"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
ä:ǟ <=> # Cns:* _  ( u: ) Cns:+ (Vow:) %^VowsLI1:0 ;

!"0:i after shortened vowel or diphthong"
!!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
!0:i <=> # Cns* [ ē: | ū: o: ] _ :Cns+ Vow: (Cns:) %^VowsShIn1:0 ;
!         _ e ( ʼ: | :ʼ ) Cns: %^PreI: ;
!!!€# v0eʼd%^PreI
!!!€0 vieʼd0

!"0:u after shortened vowel or diphthong"
!!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
!0:u <=> # Cns* [ ō: ] _ Cns:+ (Vow:) [ %^Stress1to2:0 | %^VowsShU1: ] ;

!"0:o after shortened vowel or diphthong"
!!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
!0:o <=> # Cns*  ȯ: _ (i:) Cns:+ (Vow:) [ %^VowsLI1:0 ] ;

!! ### VOWEL LENGTHENING

"a:ǭ in first syllable"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
a:ǭ <=> _ :Cns+ %^VowsL1aToǭ:0 ;
!!€# tam%^VowsL1aToǭõd
!!€0 tǭm0õd

"a:ā in first syllable"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
a:ā <=> _ [i [d|g |k|l| m |n|s| z| t s] | :Cns+ ] (Vow:) %^VowsLI1:0 ;
!!€# kand%^VowsLI1õd
!!€0 kāndõd

!"i:ī in first syllable"
!!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
!i:ī <=> Cns _ Cns:+  (Vow:) %^VowsLI1:0 ;
!!!€# niŗț%^VowsLI1%>õ
!!!€0 nīŗț00õ
!   _ e (ʼ:) Cns: %^VowsLI1:0 ;

"o:ō in first syllable"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
o:ō <=> _ [i g | (u:) :Cns+] (Vow:) %^VowsLI1:0 ;
!!€# ouki%^VowsLI1z
!!€0 ō0ki0z

!"o:i"
!!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
! o:i <=> ū: _ g (a:) %^VV2V: %^PalatalizeLeft: ;
!!!€# pūog%^VV2V%^PalatalizeLeft%>õ
!!!€0 pȯig0000õ

!! LOWER VOWELS
"ī:ē in tīe 15"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
ī:ē <=> _ (ʼ:) Vow: (Cns:)  %^VOWLower: ;
!!€# tīʼe%^VOWLower%^StodRM%^VowsRM%>šti
!!€0 tē000000šti
 # Cns* _ (ʼ:) ( e: ) Cns: %^ĪE2Ē: ;
! requires 0:e
!!€ kīel^ĪE2Ē^PalatalizeLeft
!!€ kē0ļ00

!! Destressing in second syllable
"ā:õ "
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
ā:õ <=>  _ ( %^ConsL: ) %^Stress2to1:0 [ # | %> ] ;
        _ ( %^ConsL: ) %^LongV2Õin2: ;
!!€# käp0ā%^ConsL%^LongV2Õin2
!!€0 käppõ00
     # Cns* [ Vow | ʼ: | :ʼ ]+ [ Cns (:Cns)| Cns+ ] _ z: %^Stress2to1:0  ;
!# Cns* Vow ( 0: ) :Cns+ _ %^Stress2to1:0 [ # | %> ] ;
!!€  rik0āz%^Stress2to1%^ConsRM
!!€  rikkõ000

"a:õ "
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
a:õ <=>  _ ( %^ConsL:0 ) [ %^Stress2to1:0 | %^VowsShU1: ] [ # | %> ] ;
     # Cns* [ Vow: | ʼ: | :ʼ ]+ [ Cns (:Cns)| Cns+ ] _ [ %^Stress1to2:0  (%^ConsL:) | (%^VV2V:) %^A2ÕIn2: ] [ # | %> ]  ;
!!€# tīer0a%^VV2V%^A2ÕIn2
!!€0 tierrõ00

"ū:õ "
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
ū:õ <=> # Cns* [ Vow | ʼ: | :ʼ ]+ :Cns+ _ %^Stress2to1:0 [ # | %> ] ;

"õ:i"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
 õ:i <=> [ Vow | ʼ: | :ʼ ]+ :Cns+ _ [ n: | l: | z: | ļ:] %^Õ2I:  ;
! # Cns* [ Vow | ʼ: | :ʼ ]+ :Cns+ _ [ n: | l: | z: ] %^PalatalizeLeft: ;
         [ Vow | ʼ: | :ʼ ]+ :Cns+ _ r %^Õ2I:0  ;
!         # Cns* [ Vow | ʼ: | :ʼ ]+ :Cns+ _ r %^Õ2I:0  ;
!!€# ǭʼrõn%^Õ2I%^PalatalizeLeft
!!€0 ǭʼriņ00
!!€# nȭŗkõz%^Õ2I%>ist
!!€0 nȭŗkiz00ist


!! VOWEL LOSS
